Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 19 Animal Care
4-19-18.
Penalties for violations.

Violations of the provisions of §

4-19-16

or the written agreement executed pursuant to §

4-19-16

by an adopting party are punishable by a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense, one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for the second offense and four hundred dollars ($400) for the third and subsequent offenses. Each and every incidence of non-compliance by an adopting party which continues unremedied for thirty (30) days after written notice of a violation under this section constitutes a subsequent offense and the attendant penalties will apply. Second and subsequent offenses may constitute grounds for seizure and forfeiture of the dog or cat, which seizure will be conducted by a dog officer or a police officer for the city or town in which the adopting party resides, and the seized animal will be returned to the licensed releasing agency from which it was adopted, which licensed releasing agency will be free to adopt out or euthanize the seized dog or cat. The adopting party loses all ownership rights in the seized dog or cat, forfeits all rights to any fee or deposit paid for the dog or cat, and shall have no claim against the licensed releasing agency or any other person for any expenses incurred by the adopting party for the dog or cat’s maintenance. The provisions of §§ 4-19-16 —

4-19-18

will be enforced against an adopting party by a dog officer or a police officer for the city or town in which the adopting party resides. Licensed releasing agencies must notify the animal control officer or police officer in the city or town in which the adopting party resides, in writing, within fourteen (14) days of any violation of the provisions of § 4-19-16.

Violations of §

4-19-16

or

4-19-17

by a licensed releasing agency are punishable by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense, two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the second offense and five hundred dollars ($500) for the third and subsequent offenses. The third and subsequent offenses may result in the temporary or permanent revocation of the licensed releasing agency’s license to operate. Compliance by the releasing agency with §§

4-19-16

—

4-19-18

will be monitored as to the licensed releasing agencies by the state veterinarian. The provisions of §§ 4-19-16 —

4-19-18

will be enforced against a licensed releasing agency by the division of law enforcement of the department of environmental management.

All fines collected under subsection (a) will be remitted to the town or city clerk of the municipality where the adopting party of the dog or cat resides. These fines shall be used by the municipality only for programs for the spaying or neutering of dogs or cats. All fines collected under subsection (b) will be remitted to the general treasurer and placed in a separate fund within the general fund to be called the “Animal Health Fund” which shall be administered by the general treasurer in the same manner as the general fund. All funds deposited in the “Animal Health Fund” shall be made available to the department of environmental management division of agriculture to defray any costs or expenses incurred by the state veterinarian in the enforcement of §§

4-19-16

,

4-19-17

and

4-19-18

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 24, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 417, § 1.

4-19-19.
Adoption of municipal ordinances.

No provision of this chapter prohibits any city or town from adopting any provision of this chapter as a municipal ordinance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 24, § 2.

4-19-20.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of any provision to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter and the application of any provision to persons or circumstances other than those as to which it is held invalid shall not be affected by this invalidity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 145, § 1.

4-19-21.
Use of the terms owner or guardian.

Wherever the word “owner” shall appear in this chapter it shall also mean and may be interchanged with the word “guardian” as defined in §

4-19-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 11.

4-19-22.
Animal control officers.

Effective January 1, 2019, no municipality shall employ any animal control officer who has not received certification to be an animal control officer from the National Animal Care & Control Association (NACA) or other equivalent organization as determined by the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals. All new hires will have a period of twelve (12) months from date of hire to receive certification. All existing personnel employed as animal control officers shall obtain their certification by January 1, 2019.

The training and certification program required by subsection (a) of this section shall incorporate instruction that shall meet NACA guidelines for certification, including, but not limited to, the following criteria:

Laws and regulations affecting animal control, animal welfare, and animal cruelty;

Domestic and wild animal behavior;

Handling and treatment of deceased or stray animals; and

Emergency procedures and conflict resolution skills.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 144, § 1.

4-19-23.
Pets for veterans.

A public animal shelter shall not charge an adoption fee for a dog or cat if the person adopting the dog or cat presents to the public animal shelter a current and valid driver’s license or identification card with the word “veteran” printed on its face pursuant to §

31-10-48

.

A public animal shelter may limit the number of dogs or cats adopted from that public animal shelter pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to one dog or cat during a period of every six (6) months.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 288, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 289, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.

4-19-24.
Humane transportation of K-9 partners.

For the purposes of this section, “police dog” means: a dog owned by a police department or police agency of the state of Rhode Island or any political subdivision thereof, that is used by the department or agency for official duties.

EMS personnel may provide emergency treatment to a police dog injured in the line of duty and transport the police dog by ambulance to a veterinary care facility equipped to provide emergency treatment to dogs; provided, however, that EMS personnel shall not transport an injured police dog if providing transport would inhibit their ability to provide emergency medical attention or transport to a person requiring such services.

The department of health, in consultation with the Rhode Island veterinary medical association, the Rhode Island association of fire chiefs, the Rhode Island state association of firefighters, at least two (2) practicing, licensed emergency medical technicians, the international brotherhood of police officers’ K-9 officer, the fraternal order of police’s K-9 officer, and the department of state police’s K-9 unit, shall develop policies and procedures that include, but are not limited to:

Appropriate training of EMS personnel to provide police dogs basic level first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and life-saving interventions, including, but not limited to, administering naloxone; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall authorize the provision of advanced life support care to a police dog;

Safe handling procedures for injured police dogs, including, but not limited to, the use of a box muzzle and response coordination with a law enforcement official trained in handling police dogs;

Identification of veterinary facilities that provide emergency treatment for injured police dogs;

Decontamination of stretchers, the patient compartment, and any contaminated medical equipment after a police dog has been transported by ambulance or EMS vehicle; and

Sterilization of the interior of an ambulance or EMS vehicle before being returned to human service, including, but not limited to, sanitizing all allergens and disinfection to a standard safe for human transport.

The department of health may grant a waiver from this section if the department determines that compliance poses a safety risk to the public. The department shall develop regulations regarding applications and issuance of such a waiver.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 295, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 296, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.